Illinois, session 104th, SB1636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 and by changing Section 27-22 as 6follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)8    Sec. 10-20.88. Computer science course reporting.9    (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the school 10board of a school district that maintains any of grades 11kindergarten through 8 shall report, for each school 12maintaining any of grades kindergarten through 5, the 13following data to the State Board of Education: 14        (1) the computer science content offered in those 15    grades, including the minutes of instruction time 16    dedicated to computer science, descriptions of 17    instructional content, and, if available, which State 18    learning standards for computer science are covered in the 19    instruction; and20        (2) the students receiving computer science 21    instruction in those grades and the grade level, gender, 22    race and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price 23    school meals, disability and individualized education   SB1636- 2 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    program or federal Section 504 plan status, and English 2    learner status of those students.3    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the school 4board of a school district that maintains any of grades 5kindergarten through 8 shall report, for each school 6maintaining any of grades 6 through 8, the following data to 7the State Board of Education:8        (1) the computer science courses or content offered in 9    those grades, including the course codes, if any, 10    descriptions, and, if available, which State learning 11    standards for computer science are covered in each course; 12    and13        (2) the students in those grades enrolled in computer 14    science courses and the grade level, gender, race and 15    ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 16    meals, disability and individualized education program or 17    federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner 18    status of those students.19    (c) The State Board of Education shall disaggregate the 20data collected under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and 21paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by grade level, gender, race 22and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 23meals, disability and individualized education program or 24federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner status 25and make the data available publicly, along with the data 26collected under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and paragraph   SB1636- 3 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1(1) of subsection (b). 2    (105 ILCS 5/27-22)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-22)3    Sec. 27-22. Required high school courses. 4    (a) (Blank). 5    (b) (Blank).6    (c) (Blank).7    (d) (Blank).8    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 9to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 109th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 11successfully complete all of the following courses:12        (1) Four years of language arts.13        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 14    which must be English and the other of which may be English 15    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 16    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 17    graduation requirements. 18        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 19    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 20    one of which may be a an Advanced Placement computer 21    science course. A mathematics course that includes 22    geometry content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 23    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 24    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 25    path.  SB1636- 4 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 3    of a course that includes intensive instruction in 4    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 5    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 6    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 7        (4) Two years of science.8        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 9    year must be history of the United States or a combination 10    of history of the United States and American government 11    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 12    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 13    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 14    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 15    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 16    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 17    content shall focus on government institutions, the 18    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 19    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 20    School districts may utilize private funding available for 21    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 22    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 23    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a 24    financial literacy course.25        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 26    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include   SB1636- 5 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 2    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 3    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 4    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 5    requirement under this subdivision (6). 6    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 7prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 8entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 9requirements, successfully complete all of the following 10courses: 11        (1) Four years of language arts.12        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 13    which must be English and the other of which may be English 14    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 15    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 16    graduation requirements.17        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 18    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 19    one of which may be a an Advanced Placement computer 20    science course. A mathematics course that includes 21    geometry content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 22    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 23    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 24    path.25        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 26    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English,   SB1636- 6 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 2    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 3    requirements. 4        (4) Two years of laboratory science.5        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 6    year must be history of the United States or a combination 7    of history of the United States and American government 8    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 9    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 10    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 11    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 12    Civics course content shall focus on government 13    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 14    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 15    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 16    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 17    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 18    include a financial literacy course.19        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 20    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 21    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 22    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 23    course used to satisfy the course requirement under 24    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 25    requirement under this subdivision (6). 26    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a   SB1636- 7 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 2entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 3requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign 4language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 5pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 6the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 7    (e-15) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, as a 8prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 9entering the 9th grade must successfully complete one year of 10high school computer science, which may be taken in any of 11grades 7 through 12 and shall count toward the fulfillment of 12either (i) one year of the foreign language requirement under 13subsection (e-10), (ii) the third year of mathematics 14requirement under subdivision (3) of subsection (e-5), or 15(iii) the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection 16(e-5). A computer science course counted toward the 17fulfillment of a requirement under item (i), (ii), or (iii) of 18this subsection (e-15) may also be used to fulfill the 19computer literacy requirement under subdivision (3.5) of 20subsection (e-5). 21        (1) The State Board of Education shall create 22    guidelines for school districts regarding which computer 23    science courses can fulfill a requirement under item (i) 24    or (ii) of this subsection (e-15) that maximizes 25    flexibility for students. 26        (2) If a student uses a computer science course to   SB1636- 8 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    fulfill the foreign language requirement under item (i) of 2    this subsection (e-15), then the school board must 3    designate that computer science course as equivalent to a 4    high school foreign language course and must denote on the 5    student's transcript that the computer science course 6    qualifies as a foreign language course for students under 7    item (i) of this subsection (e-15) for the purpose of 8    admission to an institution of higher education in this 9    State. 10        (3) If a student uses a computer science course to 11    fulfill the mathematics requirement under item (ii) of 12    this subsection (e-15), then the school board must 13    designate that computer science course as equivalent to a 14    high school mathematics course and must denote on the 15    student's transcript that the computer science course 16    qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative course for 17    students in accordance with subdivision (3) of subsection 18    (e-5). 19        (4) By June 30, 2026, the State Board of Education 20    shall update its existing list of course titles 21    recommended for computer science under Section 2-3.185 22    with a list of courses that can be used to satisfy the 23    requirements of this subsection (e-15); however, each 24    school district shall ensure that such courses align with 25    the State learning standards for computer science and the 26    State Board shall include on the list only courses that   SB1636- 9 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    meet the definition of computer science under Section 2    10-17a. The State Board shall update its list of 3    qualifying courses as needed to reflect changing State and 4    regional economic and educational needs. 5        (5) The requirements of this subsection (e-15) do not 6    apply to a pupil transferring to a high school in this 7    State from another state after the pupil's 11th grade 8    year. 9        (6) A school may enter into a cooperative resource 10    sharing agreement to ensure that its students can enroll 11    in a computer science course under this subsection (e-15). 12    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 13school districts of standards for writing-intensive 14coursework. 15    (f-5) If a school district offers a an Advanced Placement 16computer science course to high school students, then the 17school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 18high school mathematics course and must denote on the 19student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 20science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative 21course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 22subsection (e) of this Section. 23    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 24the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 25or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 26determined by an individualized education program.   SB1636- 10 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 29th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 3or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 4determined by an individualized education program. 5    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 6pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 7prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 8course of study is determined by an individualized education 9program. 10    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 11grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 12students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 13by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 14not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 15school year or a prior school year or to students with 16disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 17individualized education program. Subsection (e-15) does not 18apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2026-2027 school 19year or a prior school year or to students with disabilities 20whose course of study is determined by an individualized 21education program. 22    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 23provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-22.05 of this Code and 24the Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act. 25    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 26the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in   SB1636- 11 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 2to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 3Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 4(Source: P.A. 102-366, eff. 8-13-21; 102-551, eff. 1-1-22; 5102-864, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 68-2-24.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)8    Sec. 34-18.88. Computer science course reporting. 9    (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board 10shall report, for each school maintaining any of grades 11kindergarten through 5, the following data to the State Board 12of Education: 13        (1) the computer science content offered in those 14    grades, including the minutes of instruction time 15    dedicated to computer science, descriptions of 16    instructional content, and, if available, which State 17    learning standards for computer science are covered in the 18    instruction; and19        (2) the students receiving computer science 20    instruction in those grades and the grade level, gender, 21    race and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price 22    school meals, disability and individualized education 23    program or federal Section 504 plan status, and English 24    learner status of those students.25    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the board   SB1636- 12 -LRB104 10856 LNS 20938 b1shall report, for each school maintaining any of grades 6 2through 8, the following data to the State Board of Education:3        (1) the computer science courses or content offered in 4    those grades, including the course codes, if any, 5    descriptions, and, if available, which State learning 6    standards for computer science are covered in each course; 7    and8        (2) the     students enrolled in computer science courses 9    in those grades and the grade level, gender, race and 10    ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 11    meals, disability and individualized education program or 12    federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner 13    status of those students.14    (c) The State Board of Education shall disaggregate the 15data collected under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and 16paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by grade level, gender, race 17and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 18meals, disability and individualized education program or 19federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner status 20and make the data available publicly, along with the data 21collected under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and paragraph 22(1) of subsection (b).